test/src/morphology/P-mie_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mie - ei tsekattu : # Pronoun 'eg'
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: mie
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: minun
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Par: minnuu
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: minuna
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Tra: minuksi
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine: minussa
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela: minusta
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: minhuun
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ade: minula
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abl: minulta
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+All: minule
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: minutta
     
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: sie
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: sinun
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Par: sinnuu
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: sinuna
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Tra: sinuksi
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine: sinussa
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela: sinusta
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: sinhuun
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ade: sinula
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abl: sinulta
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+All: sinule
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: sinutta
     
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: hän
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: hänen
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Par: häntä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: hänenä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Tra: häneksi
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine: hänessä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela: hänestä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: hänheen
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ade: hänelä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abl: häneltä
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+All: hänele
     hän+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: hänettä
     
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: se
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: sen
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Par: sitä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: sinä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Tra: siksi
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine: siinä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela: siitä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: siihen
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ade: sillä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abl: siltä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+All: sille
     
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: met
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: meiđän
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: meiđät
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Par: meitä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess: meinä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Tra: meiksi
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine: meissä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela: meistä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: meihin
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ade: meilä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: meiltä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+All: meile
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: meittä
     
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: tet
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: teiđän
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: teiđät
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Par: teitä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess: teinä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Tra: teiksi
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine: teissä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela: teistä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: teihin
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ade: teilä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: teiltä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+All: teile
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: teittä
     
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: het
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: heiđän
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: heiđät
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Par: heitä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess: heinä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Tra: heiksi
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine: heissä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela: heistä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: heihin
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ade: heilä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: heiltä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+All: heile
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: heittä
     
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: net
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: niitten
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: net
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Par: niitä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess: niinä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Tra: niiksi
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine: niissä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela: niistä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: niihin
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ade: niilä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: niiltä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+All: niile
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: heittä, [niittä]
